Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.005

Policy and intent.

The legislature sets forth as retirement policy and intent:

(1) The retirement systems of the state shall provide similar benefits wherever possible.

(2) Persons hired into eligible positions shall accrue service credit for all service rendered.

(3) The calculation of benefits shall be done in such a manner as to prevent the arithmetic lowering of benefits.

(4) Liberalization of the granting of service credit shall not jeopardize part-time employment of retirees in ineligible positions.

[ 1991 c 343 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—1991 c 343: "The legislature finds:

(1) There is a dichotomy in the provision of service credit within the major two retirement systems of the state. Within plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system, credit is given in whole months upon completing seventy hours per month. Within plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system, full annual service credit is given for full-time employment of four-fifths or more of a school year and partial annual service credit is given for employment of less than four-fifths of a school year but more than twenty days in a school year. Plan 2 of both the public employees' and teachers' retirement systems' full monthly service credit is based on completing ninety hours in each month.

(2) There is an expressed interest by public employers in encouraging job-sharing or tandem positions wherein two persons perform one job. This is seen as opening up job opportunities for those persons who have family responsibilities prohibiting full-time employment." [ 1991 c 343 s 1.]

Effective dates—1991 c 343: "(1) Sections 3 through 11 and 14 through 18 of this act shall take effect September 1, 1991.

(2) The remainder of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1991." [ 1991 c 343 s 19.]